Utah statutes.
31A-23b-203.   Application for individual license -- Application for agency license.

(1)  This section applies to an initial or renewal license as a navigator.

(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), to obtain or renew an individual license, an individual shall:

(i)  file an application for an initial or renewal individual license with the commissioner on forms and in a manner the commissioner prescribes; and

(ii)  pay a license fee that is not refunded if the application:

(A)  is denied; or

(B)  is incomplete when filed and is never completed by the applicant.

(b)  An application described in this Subsection (2) shall provide:

(i)  information about the applicant's identity;

(ii)  the applicant's Social Security number;

(iii)  the applicant's personal history, experience, education, and business record;

(iv)  whether the applicant is 18 years of age or older;

(v)  whether the applicant has committed an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation as set forth in Section 31A-23b-401 or 31A-23b-402;

(vi)  that the applicant complies with the surety bond requirements of Section 31A-23b-207;

(vii)  that the applicant completed the training requirements in Section 31A-23b-205; and

(viii)  any other information the commissioner reasonably requires.

(3)  The commissioner may require a document reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in an application filed under this section.

(4)  An applicant's Social Security number contained in an application filed under this section is a private record under Section 63G-2-302.

(5) (a)  Subject to Subsection (5)(b), to obtain or renew a navigator agency license, a person shall:

(i)  file an application for an initial or renewal navigator agency license with the commissioner on forms and in a manner the commissioner prescribes; and

(ii)  pay a license fee that is not refunded if the application:

(A)  is denied; or

(B)  is incomplete when filed and is never completed by the applicant.

(b)  An application described in Subsection (5)(a) shall provide:

(i)  information about the applicant's identity;

(ii)  the applicant's federal employer identification number;

(iii)  the designated responsible licensed individual;

(iv)  the identity of the owners, partners, officers, and directors;

(v)  whether the applicant, or individual identified in Subsections (5)(b)(iii) and (iv), has committed an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation as set forth in Section 31A-23b-401; and

(vi)  any other information the commissioner reasonably requires.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

